Alabama, session 2026rs, SB4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-1-20.6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
Page 2

Section 1. Section 16-1-20.6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
SB4 INTRODUCED
amended to read as follows:
"§16-1-20.6
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the
Alabama Released Time Credit Act.
(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the
following:
(1) That the United States Supreme Court, in its
decision in Zorach v. Clauson, 343 U.S. 306 (1952), upheld the
constitutionality of released time programs for religious
instruction for public school students during the school day.
(2) That the United States Constitution and state law
allows local school districts to offer religious released time
education for the benefit of public school students.
(3) That the purpose of this section is to incorporate
a constitutionally acceptable method of allowing school
districts to offer released time classes and, in grades where
credit is earned, to award students elective credit for
classes taken during the school day in released time programs.
(c) As used in this section, the term released time
means a period of time during the school day when a student is
allowed to participate in an elective course in religious
instruction, conducted off school district property, by a
private entity.
(d) The State Board of Education shall adopt and each
local board of education may shall implement a policy
forallowing a student to attend released time as an elective
course if all of the following are satisfied:
(1) The parent or guardian of the student gives written
Page 3

(1) The parent or guardian of the student gives written
SB4 INTRODUCED
consent.
(2) The sponsoring entity maintains attendance records
and makes them available to the public school the student
attends.
(3) The sponsoring entity makes provisions for and
assumes liability for the student who is excused for released
time.
(4) No public funds are expended other than de minimis
administrative costs.
(5) No public school personnel are involved in
providing the religious instruction.
(e) In grades where credit is earned, a student who
participates in released time may earn elective course credit
for participation, as provided by rules adopted by the State
Board of Education for elective courses. Credit awarded may
not exceed normal credit given for an elective course in the
particular school system. The State Board of Education shall
also adopt minimum standards for class attendance necessary to
qualify for credit.
(f) A student who participates in religious instruction
for elective credit during released time shall be credited
with time spent as if the student attended school, and the
time shall be calculated as part of the actual school day.
(g) Transportation to and from the place of released
time, including transportation for any student with
disabilities, is the complete responsibility of the sponsoring
private entity, parent, guardian, or student and may not be
arranged, coordinated, or provided for by public school
Page 4

arranged, coordinated, or provided for by public school
SB4 INTRODUCED
personnel.
(h) No student may be released from a required core
curriculum class to attend released time.
(i) Nothing in this act may be construed to:
(1) Limit the authority of local boards of education to
tailor the policies required by this section to meet their
specific needs; provided the policy reflects the requirements
of this section and complies with applicable law, rules, and
regulations; or
(2) Require local boards of education that adopted
policies permitting released time instruction prior to July 1,
2026, to amend or alter those policies; provided the policies
are otherwise in compliance with all applicable laws, rules,
and regulations."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
100 2026.
Page 5